src/phonology/tat-phon.twolc
!! ============================================= !
!! The TATAR morphophonological/twolc rules file !
!! ============================================= !
!! This has been copied from ERZYA and it must be suited to TATAR


Alphabet
а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н о п р с т у ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я  
А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н О П Р С Т У Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я
!! letters are still missing
ү ә ң ө һ җ
Ү Ә Ң Ө Һ Җ


SLoss:0 !! is there such a thing

%- !Hyphen with constructions 
%>
# 
;


Sets

Vows = а о у ы э я ё ю и е ;
verbStemVows = а о э я ё е ;
verbStemVowStrong = а о э я ё е ;
noGlideVow = а о у ы э ;
glideVow = я ё ю и е ;


Cns = б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ;
NPC = б в г д ж з к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ; ! Nonpalatal Consonants
CnsVoiced = б в г д ж з й л м н р ;
CnsVoicedDent = д з л н р ;
CnsVoicedNonDent = б в г ж й м ;
CnsVoiceless = к п с т ф х ц ч ш щ ;
CnsVoicelessDent = с т ц ;
CnsVoicelessNonDent = к п ф х ч ш щ ;
CnsNonDent = б в г ж к м п ф х ч ш щ ;
CnsDent = д з л н р с т ц  ;
CnsDentNoL = д з н р с т ц  ;

Letters = Vows Cns ь ъ ;

!Definitions


Rules



!!SLoss s s > s = s 0 0 s
"s:0"
с:0 <=> с _ %>: SLoss:0 с ;

!€ класс%>SLossс
!€ клас000с


!Disallow

"Disallow TLoss after non-t"
SLoss:0 /<= [[ :* Letters ] - [ :* :т ] ] %>: _ ;
